Illinois, session 104th, HB4825.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Birth Control Services to Minors Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 10/1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4651)7    Sec. 1. 8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Contraceptive services" has the same meaning ascribed to 10that term in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) Section 356z.4 of 11the Illinois Insurance Code, but does not include 12sterilization.13    "Contraceptive supplies" means all contraceptive drugs, 14devices, and products approved by the federal Food and Drug 15Administration to prevent pregnancy, including long-acting 16reversible contraceptives, nonprescription oral hormonal 17contraceptives, and nonprescription emergency contraceptives. 18    (b) Any minor may give effective consent for contraceptive 19services or supplies and the consent of no other person is 20required. For such purposes, a minor is deemed to have the same 21legal capacity to act and has the same powers and obligations 22as a person of legal age.23Birth control services and information may be rendered by   HB4825- 2 -LRB104 17782 KTG 31214 b1doctors licensed in Illinois to practice medicine in all of 2its branches to any minor:3    1. who is married; or4    2. who is a parent; or5    3. who is pregnant; or6    4. who has the consent of his parent or legal guardian; or7    5. as to whom the failure to provide such services would 8create a serious health hazard; or9    6. who is referred for such services by a physician, 10clergyman or a planned parenthood agency.11(Source: P.A. 76-1550.)